Arkansas, session 2025, SB386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 10-3-220 is amended to read as follows:
10-3-220. Monitoring of changes made in federal income tax laws and
regulations — Reports of secretary.
(a) The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration
shall monitor changes made in federal income tax laws and regulations for the
purpose of determining how the changes may affect Arkansas income tax law and
for the purpose of determining how the changes differ from provisions adopted
for Arkansas income tax purposes.
(b) The secretary shall report his or her findings annually to the
House Committee on Revenue and Taxation and the Senate Committee on Revenue
*JLL175*
03/05/2025 9:57:52 AM JLL175

SB386
and Taxation and may make such other reports to the House Committee on
Revenue and Taxation and the Senate Committee on Revenue and Taxation as he
or she deems necessary.

































03/05/2025 9:57:52 AM JLL175